New Jersey, session 222, A3311.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Commissioner of Human Services shall appoint a State Dementia Services Coordinator.  The coordinator shall be qualified by training and experience to perform the duties of the position. The duties and responsibilities of the State coordinator shall include: a.  developing and coordinating the States implementation of a master plan to address the impact of Alzheimers disease and related disorders or other forms of dementia; b.  coordinating with existing State programs, services, facilities, and agencies that provide services and other assistance to persons with Alzheimer's disease and related disorders or other forms of dementia, including, but not limited to the Alzheimer's and Dementia Care Long-Term Advisory Commission established pursuant to P.L.2023, c.41 (C.26:2M-20 et seq.); c.  developing procedures to facilitate communication, collaboration, coordination, and information sharing between, and prevent the duplication of services provided by, State departments, offices, divisions, agencies, and community-based organizations to persons with Alzheimer's disease and related disorders or other forms of dementia; d.  identifying service gaps in the provision of appropriate services and other assistance by State departments, offices, divisions, agencies, and community-based organizations to persons with Alzheimer's disease and related disorders or other forms of dementia; and e.  increasing awareness of, and facilitating access to, quality, coordinated treatment and care for persons with Alzheimer's disease and related disorders or other forms of dementia. 2.  The State Dementia Services Coordinator appointed pursuant to section 1 of this act shall be authorized to call upon any department, office, division, or agency of the State to supply the State coordinator with data and any other information or assistance available to the department, office, division, or agency as the State coordinator deems necessary to discharge the coordinators duties.  Each department, office, division, or agency, to the extent not inconsistent with law, shall cooperate fully with the State coordinator within the limits of its statutory authority, and provide such assistance on a timely basis to enable the State coordinator to perform the coordinators duties pursuant to this act. The State coordinator may consult with experts or other knowledgeable individuals in the public or private sector on any aspect of the coordinator's mission. 3.  The Commissioner of Human Services shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 4.  There is appropriated $150,000 from the General Fund to the Department of Human Services to effectuate the purposes of this act. 5.  This act shall take effect 90 days after the date of enactment, except that the Commissioner of Human Services may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.